Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201854-186.01
Out-of-state brand permit, defined.

Out-of-state brand
permit means an authorization for a one-time use of a brand registered with
a state other than Nebraska to brand cattle imminently being exported out
of Nebraska.

Laws 2013, LB435, § 3.